Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [593.55] FELONS INELIGIBLE FOR JURY SERVICE WHILE UNDER SUPERVISION. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law or court rule to the contrary, a person who is under correctional supervision for a felony offense is not eligible to serve on a jury, including a grand jury, in a criminal case. This prohibition applies until the person's sentence has been discharged as provided in section 609.165. new text end